District of Columbia statutes.
38-826.03

School health centers.

(a)

The Department of Health, in conjunction with the Department of Healthcare Finance, the District of Columbia Public Schools, the Department of General Services, and the Public Charter School Board, shall develop a plan to establish and operate school health centers in public schools and public charter schools on or before December 31, 2015.

(b)

The plan shall include the following:

(1)

A needs assessment to determine where school health centers shall be located, including a justification for any determination that a school health center is not needed at a public high school; and

(2)

A proposal for financial sustainability for the school health centers.

(c)

The plan shall be submitted to the Mayor, the Council, and the Healthy Schools and Youth Commission on or before December 31, 2012.

History

July 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-209, § 603, 57 DCR 4779
Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-37, § 2(m), 58 DCR 6841
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4062(l), 59 DCR 8025

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-37, in subsec. (c), substituted “December 31, 2011” for “December 31, 2010”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization” in (a); and substituted “December 31, 2012” for “December 31, 2011” in (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(m) of Healthy Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-143, August 9, 2011, 58 DCR 6814).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(l) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4062(l) of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).

Editor's Notes

Section 4063 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that § 4062 of the act shall apply as of June 20, 2012.